Montana, session 2025, SB59.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 59
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 59
Section 1. Staff Sergeant Arthur J Rambo memorial bridge. (1) The bridge spanning the Kootenai
River in Libby, Montana, on highway 37 is dedicated to Staff Sergeant Arthur J Rambo.
(2) The department shall design and install appropriate signs on each end of the bridge marking
the Staff Sergeant Arthur J Rambo memorial.
(3) The department shall design and install a memorial plaque at a location near the bridge.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
60, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 60, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 59
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 59, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 59
INTRODUCED BY M. CUFFE
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE STAFF SERGEANT ARTHUR J RAMBO MEMORIAL BRIDGE; AND DIRECTING
THE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION TO INSTALL SIGNS.